Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Chapter 11. Implied Consent Law

§ 63-11-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Mississippi Implied Consent Law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8175-01; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 1, eff from and after April 1, 1972.

§ 63-11-3.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases shall have the meaning ascribed herein, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Driving privilege” or “privilege” means both the driver’s license of those licensed in Mississippi and the driving privilege of unlicensed residents and the privilege of nonresidents, licensed or not, the purpose of this section being to make unlicensed and nonresident drivers subject to the same penalties as licensed residents.

“Community service” means work, projects or services for the benefit of the community assigned, supervised and recorded by appropriate public officials.

“Chemical test” means an analysis of a person’s blood, breath, urine or other bodily substance for the determination of the presence of alcohol or any other substance which may impair a person’s mental or physical ability.

“Refusal to take breath, urine and/or blood test” means an individual declining to take a chemical test, and/or the failure to provide an adequate breath sample as required by the Implied Consent Law when requested by a law enforcement officer.

“Alcohol concentration” means either grams of alcohol per one hundred (100) milliliters of blood or grams of alcohol per two hundred ten (210) liters of breath.

“Qualified person to withdraw blood” means any person who has been trained to withdraw blood in the course of their employment duties including but not limited to laboratory personnel, phlebotomist, emergency medical personnel, nurses and doctors.

“Victim impact panel” means a two-hour seminar in which victims of DUI accidents relate their experiences following the accident to persons convicted under the Implied Consent Law. Paneling programs shall be based on a model developed by Mothers Against Drunk Driving (MADD) victim panel or equivalent program approved by the court.

“Booked” means the administrative step taken after the arrested person is brought to the police station, which involves entry of the person’s name, the crime for which the arrest was made, and other relevant facts on the police docket, and which may also include photographing, fingerprinting, and the like.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8175-24; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 24; Laws, 1983, ch. 466, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 527, § 3, eff from and after July 2, 1996.

§ 63-11-5.
Implied consent to chemical tests; administration of tests; warnings; form of traffic tickets, citations or affidavits; advice regarding right to request legal or medical assistance; rules and regulations.

[Effective until July 1, 2020, this section will read as follows:]

Any person who operates a motor vehicle upon the public highways, public roads and streets of this state shall be deemed to have given his consent, subject to the provisions of this chapter, to a chemical test or tests of his breath for the purpose of determining alcohol concentration. A person shall give his consent to a chemical test or tests of his breath, blood or urine for the purpose of determining the presence in his body of any other substance which would impair a person’s ability to operate a motor vehicle.

The test or tests shall be administered at the direction of any authorized officer, when such officer has reasonable grounds and probable cause to believe that the person was driving or had under his actual physical control a motor vehicle upon the public streets or highways of this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any other substance which had impaired such person’s ability to operate a motor vehicle.

No such test shall be administered by any person who has not met all the educational and training requirements of the appropriate course of study prescribed by the Board on Law Enforcement Officers Standards and Training; provided, however, that sheriffs and elected chiefs of police shall be exempt from such educational and training requirement. No such tests shall be given by any officer or any agency to any person within fifteen (15) minutes of consumption of any substance by mouth.

For purposes of this subsection (1), the term “authorized officer” means any highway patrol officer, sheriff or his duly commissioned deputies, police officer in any incorporated municipality, national park ranger, officer of a state-supported institution of higher learning campus police force if such officer is exercising this authority in regard to a violation that occurred on campus property, or security officer appointed and commissioned pursuant to the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Security Officer Law of 1978 if such officer is exercising this authority in regard to a violation that occurred within the limits of the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District.

If the officer has reasonable grounds and probable cause to believe such person to have been driving a motor vehicle upon the public highways, public roads, and streets of this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, such officer shall inform such person that his failure to submit to such chemical test or tests of his breath shall result in the suspension of his privilege to operate a motor vehicle upon the public streets and highways of this state for a period of ninety (90) days in the event such person has not previously been convicted of a violation of Section 63-11-30, or, for a period of one (1) year in the event of any previous conviction of such person under Section 63-11-30.

The traffic ticket, citation or affidavit issued to a person arrested for a violation of this chapter shall conform to the requirements of Section 63-9-21(3) (b), and, if filed electronically, shall conform to Section 63-9-21(8).

Any person arrested under the provisions of this chapter shall be informed that he has the right to telephone for the purpose of requesting legal or medical assistance immediately after being booked for a violation under this chapter.

The Commissioner of Public Safety and the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory created pursuant to Section 45-1-17 are authorized to adopt procedures, rules and regulations applicable to the Implied Consent Law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8175-09; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 9; Laws, 1981, ch. 491, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 466, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 568, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 480, § 4; Laws, 1991, ch. 577, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 525, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 354, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 527, § 4; Laws, 1998, ch. 551, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 550, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 452, § 13; Laws, 2016, ch. 376, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 447, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2020.

§ 63-11-5.
Implied consent to chemical tests; administration of tests; warnings; form of traffic tickets, citations or affidavits; advice regarding right to request legal or medical assistance; rules and regulations.

[Effective from and after July 1, 2020, this section will read:]

Any person who operates a motor vehicle upon the public highways, public roads and streets of this state shall be deemed to have given his consent, subject to the provisions of this chapter, to a chemical test or tests of his breath, blood or urine for the purpose of determining alcohol concentration. A person shall give his consent to a chemical test or tests of his breath, blood or urine for the purpose of determining the presence in his body of any other substance which would impair a person’s ability to operate a motor vehicle.

The test or tests shall be administered at the direction of any authorized officer, when such officer has reasonable grounds and probable cause to believe that the person was driving or had under his actual physical control a motor vehicle upon the public streets or highways of this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any other substance which had impaired such person’s ability to operate a motor vehicle.

A breath analysis test must be administered by a person who has met all the educational and training requirements of the appropriate course of study prescribed by the Board on Law Enforcement Officers Standards and Training; however, sheriffs and elected chiefs of police are exempt from the educational and training requirement. A breath analysis test must not be given to any person within fifteen (15) minutes of consumption of any substance by mouth.

For purposes of this section, the term “authorized officer” means any highway patrol officer, sheriff or his duly commissioned deputies, police officer in any incorporated municipality, national park ranger, officer of a state-supported institution of higher learning campus police force if such officer is exercising this authority in regard to a violation that occurred on campus property, or security officer appointed and commissioned pursuant to the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Security Officer Law of 1978 if such officer is exercising this authority in regard to a violation that occurred within the limits of the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District.

If the officer has reasonable grounds and probable cause to believe such person to have been driving a motor vehicle upon the public highways, public roads, and streets of this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any other substance that has impaired the person’s ability to operate a motor vehicle, the officer shall inform the person that his failure to submit to such chemical test or tests of his breath, blood or urine shall result in the suspension of his privilege to operate a motor vehicle upon the public streets and highways of this state for a period of ninety (90) days if the person has not previously been convicted of a violation of Section 63-11-30, or, for a period of one (1) year if the person has a prior conviction under Section 63-11-30.

The traffic ticket, citation or affidavit issued to a person arrested for a violation of this chapter shall conform to the requirements of Section 63-9-21(3)(b), and, if filed electronically, shall conform to Section 63-9-21(8).

Any person arrested under the provisions of this chapter shall be informed that he has the right to telephone for the purpose of requesting legal or medical assistance immediately after being booked for a violation under this chapter.

The Commissioner of Public Safety and the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory created pursuant to Section 45-1-17 are authorized to adopt procedures, rules and regulations applicable to the Implied Consent Law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8175-09; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 9; Laws, 1981, ch. 491, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 466, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 568, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 480, § 4; Laws, 1991, ch. 577, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 525, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 354, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 527, § 4; Laws, 1998, ch. 551, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 550, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 452, § 13; Laws, 2016, ch. 376, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 447, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2020.

§ 63-11-7.
Authorization of blood test for dead or unconscious accident victims; use of test results.

If any person be unconscious or dead as a result of an accident, or unconscious at the time of arrest or apprehension or when the test is to be administered, or is otherwise in a condition rendering him incapable of refusal, such person shall be subjected to a blood test for the purpose of determining the alcoholic content of his blood as provided in this chapter, if the arresting officer has reasonable grounds to believe the person to have been driving a motor vehicle upon the public highways, public roads and streets of this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor. The results of such test or tests, however, shall not be used in evidence against such person in any court or before any regulatory body without the consent of the person so tested, or, if deceased, such person’s legal representative. However, refusal of release of evidence so obtained by such officer or agency will in criminal actions against such person result in the suspension of his or her driver’s license for a period of ninety days as provided in this chapter for conscious and capable persons who have refused to submit to such test. Blood may only be withdrawn under the provisions of Section 63-11-9. It is the intent of this chapter that blood samples taken under this section shall be used exclusively for statistical evaluation of accident causes with safeguards established to protect the identity of such victims and to extend the rights of privileged communications to those engaged in taking, handling and evaluating such statistical evidence.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8175-10; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 10, eff from and after April 1, 1972.

§ 63-11-8.
Testing of motor vehicle operator involved in accident resulting in death.

The operator of any motor vehicle involved in an accident that results in a death shall be tested for the purpose of determining the alcohol content or drug content of such operator’s blood, breath or urine. Any blood withdrawal required by this section shall be administered by any qualified person and shall be administered within two (2) hours after such accident, if possible. The exact time of the accident, to the extent possible, and the exact time of the blood withdrawal shall be recorded.

If any investigating law enforcement officer has reasonable grounds to believe that a person is the operator of a motor vehicle involved in an accident that has resulted in a death, it shall be such officer’s duty to see that a chemical test is administered as required by this section.

The results of a test administered pursuant to this section may be used as evidence in any court or administrative hearing without the consent of the person so tested.

No person may refuse to submit to a chemical test required under the provisions of this section.

Analysis of blood or urine to determine alcohol or drug content pursuant to this section shall be conducted by the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory or a laboratory whose methods and procedures have been approved by the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 540, § 4; Laws, 1996, ch. 527, § 5; Laws, 2015, ch. 452, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 63-11-9.
Administration of blood test under § 63-11-7.

Under Section 63-11-7, any qualified person acting at the request of a law enforcement officer may withdraw blood for the purpose of determining the alcoholic content therein. This limitation shall not apply to the taking of breath or urine specimens.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8175-17; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 17; Laws, 1996, ch. 527, § 6, eff from and after July 2, 1996.

§ 63-11-11.
Taking of urine specimens.

If the test given under the provisions of this chapter is a chemical test of urine, the person tested shall be given such privacy in the taking of the urine specimen as will insure the accuracy of the specimen and, at the same time, maintain the dignity of the individual involved.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8175-19; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 19, eff from and after April 1, 1972.

§ 63-11-13.
Right of accused to have test administered by person of his choice; effect of failure to obtain additional test.

The person tested may, at his own expense, have a physician, registered nurse, clinical laboratory technologist or clinical laboratory technician or any other qualified person of his choosing administer a test, approved by the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory created pursuant to Section 45-1-17, in addition to any other test, for the purpose of determining the amount of alcohol in his blood at the time alleged as shown by chemical analysis of his blood, breath or urine. The failure or inability to obtain an additional test by such arrested person shall not preclude the admissibility in evidence of the test taken at the direction of a law enforcement officer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8175-18; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 18; Laws, 1981, ch. 491, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 452, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 63-11-15.
Availability of information concerning test directed by law enforcement officer to accused or his attorney.

Upon the written request of the person tested, or his attorney, full information concerning the test taken at the direction of the law enforcement officer shall be made available to him or to his attorney.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8175-20; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 20, eff from and after April 1, 1972.

§ 63-11-17.
Liability for administering test or analysis.

No qualified person, hospital, clinic or funeral home shall incur any civil or criminal liability as the result of the proper administration of a test or chemical analysis of a person’s breath, blood or urine when requested in writing by a law enforcement officer to administer such a test or perform such chemical analysis.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8175-21; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 21; Laws, 1973, ch. 354, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 527, § 7, eff from and after July 2, 1996.

§ 63-11-19.
Requirements as to methods of testing and qualifications of test administrators; certification of administrators; testing and certification of accuracy of methods, machines or devices.

A chemical analysis of the person’s breath, blood or urine, to be considered valid under the provisions of this section, shall have been performed according to methods approved by the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory created pursuant to Section 45-1-17 and the Commissioner of Public Safety and performed by an individual possessing a valid permit issued by the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory for making such analysis. The Mississippi Forensics Laboratory and the Commissioner of Public Safety are authorized to approve satisfactory techniques or methods, to ascertain the qualifications and competence of individuals to conduct such analyses, and to issue permits which shall be subject to termination or revocation at the discretion of the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory. The Mississippi Forensics Laboratory shall not approve the permit required herein for any law enforcement officer other than a member of the State Highway Patrol, a sheriff or his deputies, a city policeman, an officer of a state-supported institution of higher learning campus police force, a security officer appointed and commissioned pursuant to the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District Security Officer Law of 1978, a national park ranger, a national park ranger technician, a military policeman stationed at a United States military base located within this state other than a military policeman of the Army or Air National Guard or of Reserve Units of the Army, Air Force, Navy or Marine Corps, a marine law enforcement officer employed by the Department of Marine Resources, or a conservation officer employed by the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks. The permit given a marine law enforcement officer shall authorize such officer to administer tests only for violations of Sections 59-23-1 through 59-23-7. The permit given a conservation officer shall authorize such officer to administer tests only for violations of Sections 59-23-1 through 59-23-7 and for hunting related incidents resulting in injury or death to any person by discharge of a weapon as provided under Section 49-4-31.

The Mississippi Forensics Laboratory shall make periodic, but not less frequently than quarterly, tests of the methods, machines or devices used in making chemical analysis of a person’s breath as shall be necessary to ensure the accuracy thereof, and shall issue its certificate to verify the accuracy of the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8175-16; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 16; Laws, 1978, ch. 526, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 491, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 568, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 577, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 620, § 5; Laws, 1999, ch. 585, § 6; Laws, 2006, ch. 553, § 5; Laws, 2015, ch. 452, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 63-11-21.
Actions by law enforcement officer upon refusal of driver to submit to test generally.

If a person refuses upon the request of a law enforcement officer to submit to a chemical test of his breath designated by the law enforcement agency as provided in Section 63-11-5, none shall be given, but the officer shall at that point demand the driver’s license of the person, who shall deliver his driver’s license into the hands of the officer. If a person refuses to submit to a chemical test under the provisions of this chapter, the person shall be informed by the law enforcement officer that the refusal to submit to the test shall subject him to suspension of the privilege to operate a motor vehicle. The officer shall give the driver a receipt for his license on forms prescribed and furnished by the Commissioner of Public Safety. The officer shall forward the driver’s license together with a sworn report to the Commissioner of Public Safety stating that he had reasonable grounds and probable cause to believe the person had been operating a motor vehicle upon the public highways, public roads and streets of this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any other substance which may impair a person’s mental or physical ability, stating the grounds, and that the person had refused to submit to the chemical test of his breath upon request of the law enforcement officer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8175-11; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 11; Laws, 1981, ch. 491, § 4; Laws, 1983, ch. 466, § 3; Laws, 1991, ch. 480, § 5; Laws, 1996, ch. 527, § 8; Laws, 2013, ch. 489, § 6; Laws, 2016, ch. 503, § 3, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2016.

§ 63-11-23.
Review of report of law enforcement officer by Commissioner of Public Safety; notice of suspension; seizure of license where test indicates blood alcohol concentration above specified level; temporary permit to drive; denial of permit; representation of state in proceedings.

[Effective until July 1, 2020, this section will read as follows:]

Administrative license suspension for test refusal.The Commissioner of Public Safety, or his authorized agent, shall review the sworn report by a law enforcement officer as provided in Section 63-11-21.

If upon review the Commissioner of Public Safety, or his authorized agent, finds (i) that the law enforcement officer had reasonable grounds and probable cause to believe the person had been operating a motor vehicle upon the public highways, public roads and streets of this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any other substance that may impair a person’s mental or physical ability; (ii) that he refused to submit to the chemical test upon request of the officer; and (iii) that the person was informed that his license and driving privileges would be suspended or denied if he refused to submit to the chemical test, then the Commissioner of Public Safety, or his authorized agent, shall give notice to the licensee that, unless the person obtains an interlock-restricted license, his license or permit to drive, or any nonresident operating privilege, shall be suspended thirty (30) days after the date of the notice for a period of ninety (90) days if the person has not previously been convicted of or nonadjudicated for a violation of Section 63-11-30, or, for a period of one (1) year if the person was previously convicted or nonadjudicated under Section 63-11-30. If the commissioner or his authorized agent determines that the license or permit should not be suspended, he shall return the license or permit to the licensee.

The notice of suspension shall be in writing and conform to Section 63-1-52.

Extension or suspension of privilege to drive; request for trial.

If the chemical testing of a person’sbreath indicates the blood alcohol concentration was eight one-hundredthspercent (.08%) or more for persons who are above the legal age topurchase alcoholic beverages under state law, or two one-hundredthspercent (.02%) or more for persons who are below the legal age topurchase alcoholic beverages under state law, based upon grams ofalcohol per one hundred (100) milliliters of blood or grams of alcoholper two hundred ten (210) liters of breath as shown by a chemicalanalysis of the person’s blood, breath, or urine, the arrestingofficer shall seize the license and give the driver a receipt forhis license on forms prescribed by the Commissioner of Public Safetyand shall promptly forward the license together with a sworn reportto the Commissioner of Public Safety. The receipt given a person shallbe valid as a permit to operate a motor vehicle for thirty (30) daysin order that the defendant may be processed through the court havingoriginal jurisdiction and a final disposition had.

If the defendant requests a trial within thirty (30) days and trial is not commenced within thirty (30) days, then the court shall determine if the delay in the trial is the fault of the defendant or his counsel. If the court finds that it is not the fault of the defendant or his counsel, then the court shall order the defendant’s privileges to operate a motor vehicle to be extended until the defendant is convicted upon final order of the court.

If a receipt or permit to drive issued under this subsection expires without a trial having been requested as provided in this subsection, then the Commissioner of Public Safety or his authorized agent shall suspend the license or permit to drive or any nonresident operating privilege for the applicable period of time as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

Offenders driving without a license.If the person is a resident without a license or permit to operate a motor vehicle in this state, the Commissioner of Public Safety, or his authorized agent, shall deny to the person the issuance of a license or permit for a period of one (1) year beginning thirty (30) days after the date of notice of the suspension.

Appeal.It shall be the duty of the municipal prosecuting attorney, county prosecuting attorney, an attorney employed under the provisions of Section 19-3-49, or if there is not a prosecuting attorney for the municipality or county, the duty of the district attorney to represent the state in any hearing on a de novo appeal held under the provisions of Section 63-11-25, Section 63-11-37 or Section 63-11-30.

Suspension subsequent to conviction.Unless the person obtains an interlock-restricted license or the court orders the person to exercise the privilege to operate a motor vehicle only under an interlock-restricted license, thirty (30) days after receipt of the court abstract documenting a person’s conviction under Section 63-11-30, the Department of Public Safety shall suspend the driver’s license and privileges of the person to operate a motor vehicle as follows:

When sentenced under Section 63-11-30(2):

For a first offense: one hundred twenty (120) days;

For a second offense: one (1) year;

For a third offense: for the full period of the person’s sentence; upon release from incarceration, the person will be eligible for only an interlock-restricted license for three (3) years;

For a fourth or subsequent offense: for the full period of the person’s sentence; upon release from incarceration, the person will be eligible for only an interlock-restricted license for ten (10) years.

When sentenced under Section 63-11-30(3) (Zero Tolerance for Minors):

For a first offense: one hundred twenty (120) days;

For a second offense: one (1) year;

For a third offense occurring within five (5) years, suspend or deny the driving privilege for two (2) years or until the person reaches the age of twenty-one (21), whichever is longer.

Suspensions.

Notices of suspension given under this section shall be in writing and conform to Section 63-1-52.

Suspensions under this and any other chapter shall run consecutively and not concurrently.

License reinstatement.A person is eligible for an unrestricted license when the person has completed an alcohol safety education program as provided in Section 63-11-32, has satisfied all other conditions of law and of the person’s sentence or nonadjudication, and is not otherwise barred from obtaining an unrestricted license.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8175-12; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 12; Laws, 1981, ch. 491, § 5; Laws, 1983, ch. 466, § 4; Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 25; Laws, 1991, ch. 412, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 527, § 9; Laws, 1998, ch. 505, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 542, § 2; Laws, 2002, ch. 367, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 489, § 7; Laws, 2014, ch. 493, § 4; Laws, 2016, ch. 503, § 4, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 447, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2020.

§ 63-11-23.
Review of report of law enforcement officer by Commissioner of Public Safety; notice of suspension; seizure of license where test indicates blood alcohol concentration above specified level; temporary permit to drive; denial of permit; representation of state in proceedings.

[Effective from and after July 1, 2020, this section will read:]

Administrative license suspension for test refusal. The Commissioner of Public Safety, or his authorized agent, shall review the sworn report by a law enforcement officer as provided in Section 63-11-21.

If upon review the Commissioner of Public Safety, or his authorized agent, finds (i) that the law enforcement officer had reasonable grounds and probable cause to believe the person had been operating a motor vehicle upon the public highways, public roads and streets of this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any other substance that may impair a person’s mental or physical ability; (ii) that the person refused to submit to the chemical test of the person’s breath, blood or urine upon request of the officer; and (iii) that the person was informed that his license and driving privileges would be suspended or denied if he refused to submit to the chemical test of his breath, blood or urine, then the Commissioner of Public Safety, or his authorized agent, shall give notice to the licensee that his license or permit to drive, or any nonresident operating privilege, shall be suspended thirty (30) days after the date of the notice for a period of ninety (90) days if the person has not previously been convicted of or nonadjudicated for a violation of Section 63-11-30, or, for a period of one (1) year if the person was previously convicted or nonadjudicated under Section 63-11-30. If the commissioner or his authorized agent determines that the license or permit should not be suspended, he shall return the license or permit to the licensee.

The notice of suspension shall be in writing and conform to Section 63-1-52.

A person may continue to drive on either an interlock-restricted license or under a drug-testing program if so ordered by a court in the course of a criminal proceeding for a violation of Section 63-11-30.

Extension or suspension of privilege to drive; request for trial. (a) If the chemical testing of a person’s breath indicates the blood alcohol concentration was eight one-hundredths percent (.08%) or more for persons who are above the legal age to purchase alcoholic beverages under state law, or two one-hundredths percent (.02%) or more for persons who are below the legal age to purchase alcoholic beverages under state law, based upon grams of alcohol per one hundred (100) milliliters of blood or grams of alcohol per two hundred ten (210) liters of breath as shown by a chemical analysis of the person’s blood, breath, or urine, the arresting officer shall seize the license and give the driver a receipt for his license on forms prescribed by the Commissioner of Public Safety and shall promptly forward the license together with a sworn report to the Commissioner of Public Safety. The receipt given a person shall be valid as a permit to operate a motor vehicle for thirty (30) days in order that the defendant may be processed through the court having original jurisdiction and a final disposition had.

Offenders driving without a license. If the person is a resident without a license or permit to operate a motor vehicle in this state, the Commissioner of Public Safety, or his authorized agent, shall deny to the person the issuance of a license or permit for a period of one (1) year beginning thirty (30) days after the date of notice of the suspension.

Appeal. It shall be the duty of the municipal prosecuting attorney, county prosecuting attorney, an attorney employed under the provisions of Section 19-3-49, or if there is not a prosecuting attorney for the municipality or county, the duty of the district attorney to represent the state in any hearing on a de novo appeal held under the provisions of Section 63-11-25, Section 63-11-37 or Section 63-11-30.

Suspension subsequent to conviction. Unless the person obtains an interlock-restricted license or the court orders the person to exercise the privilege to operate a motor vehicle only under an interlock-restricted license or while participating in a court-ordered drug-testing program, thirty (30) days after receipt of the court abstract documenting a person’s conviction under Section 63-11-30, the Department of Public Safety shall suspend the driver’s license and privileges of the person to operate a motor vehicle as follows:

When sentenced under Section 63-11-30(2):

For a first offense: one hundred twenty (120) days;

For a second offense: one (1) year;

For a third offense: for the full period of the person’s sentence; upon release from incarceration, the person will be eligible for only an interlock-restricted license for three (3) years;

For a fourth or subsequent offense: for the full period of the person’s sentence; upon release from incarceration, the person will be eligible for only an interlock-restricted license for ten (10) years and will further be subject to court-ordered drug testing if the original offense involved operating a motor vehicle under the influence of a drug other than alcohol.

When sentenced under Section 63-11-30(3) (Zero Tolerance for Minors):

For a first offense: one hundred twenty (120) days;

For a second offense: one (1) year;

For a third offense occurring within five (5) years, suspend or deny the driving privilege for two (2) years or until the person reaches the age of twenty-one (21), whichever is longer.

Suspensions. (a) Notices of suspension given under this section shall be in writing and conform to Section 63-1-52.

License reinstatement. A person is eligible for an unrestricted license when the person has completed an alcohol safety education program as provided in Section 63-11-32, has satisfied all other conditions of law and of the person’s sentence or nonadjudication, and is not otherwise barred from obtaining an unrestricted license.

If the defendant requests a trial within thirty (30) days and trial is not commenced within thirty (30) days, then the court shall determine if the delay in the trial is the fault of the defendant or his counsel. If the court finds that it is not the fault of the defendant or his counsel, then the court shall order the defendant’s privileges to operate a motor vehicle to be extended until the defendant is convicted upon final order of the court.

If a receipt or permit to drive issued under this subsection expires without a trial having been requested as provided in this subsection, then the Commissioner of Public Safety, or his authorized agent, shall suspend the license or permit to drive or any nonresident operating privilege for the applicable period of time as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

Suspensions under this and any other chapter shall run consecutively and not concurrently.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8175-12; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 12; Laws, 1981, ch. 491, § 5; Laws, 1983, ch. 466, § 4; Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 25; Laws, 1991, ch. 412, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 527, § 9; Laws, 1998, ch. 505, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 542, § 2; Laws, 2002, ch. 367, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 489, § 7; Laws, 2014, ch. 493, § 4; Laws, 2016, ch. 503, § 4, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 447, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2020.

§ 63-11-25.
Appeals from forfeiture, suspension or denial of license by commissioner generally; exercise of driving privilege suspended during pendency of appeal.

If the forfeiture, suspension or denial of issuance is sustained by the Commissioner of Public Safety, or his duly authorized agent pursuant to subsection (1) of Section 63-11-23, upon such hearing, the person aggrieved may file within ten (10) days after the rendition of such decision a petition in the circuit or county court having original jurisdiction of the violation for review of such decision and such hearing upon review shall proceed as a trial de novo before the court without a jury. Provided further, that no such party shall be allowed to exercise the driving privilege while any such appeal is pending.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8175-13; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 13; Laws, 1983, ch. 466, § 5; Laws, 1996, ch. 527, § 10, eff from and after July 2, 1996.

§ 63-11-26.
Actions which foreclose judicial review.

When the commissioner of public safety, or his authorized agent, shall suspend the driver’s license or permit to drive of a person or shall deny the issuance of a license or permit to a person as provided in Section 63-11-30, the person shall not be entitled to any judicial review of or appeal from the actions of the commissioner. A final conviction under said section shall finally adjudicate the privilege of such convicted person to operate a motor vehicle upon the public highways, public roads and streets of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 491, § 9; Laws, 1983, ch. 466, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 63-11-27.
Notification of authorities in home state of suspension of nonresident drivers privilege.

When it has been finally determined under the procedures of Sections 63-11-21 through 63-11-25, that a nonresident’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state has been suspended, the commissioner, or his duly authorized agent, shall give information in writing of the action taken to the motor vehicle administrator of the state of the person’s residence and of any state in which he has a license.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8175-14; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, § 14, eff from and after April 1, 1972.

§ 63-11-29.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1983, ch. 466, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

[Codes, 1942, §§ 8175-02, 8175-03; Laws, 1971, ch. 515, §§ 2, 3]